West Virginia, session 2025, SB353.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 8. Authorization for Department of Transportation to promulgate legislative rules. §64-8-1. Division of Highways. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 27, 2024, authorized under the authority of §17-2A-8 of this code, modified by the Division of Highways to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 11, 2024, relating to the Division of Highways (construction and reconstruction of state roads, 157 CSR 03), is authorized.